Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 47. MEI Project Approval Commission.

§ 30-309.
MEI Project Approval Commission; membership; terms; compensation and expenses; definition.

The MEI Project Approval Commission (the Commission) is established as an advisory commission in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission shall be to review financing for individual incentive packages, including but not limited to packages offering tax incentives, for economic development, film, and episodic television projects (including but not limited to MEI projects) for which (i) one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not authorized under current law or an amendment by the General Assembly is being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included as part of the incentive package or (ii) the aggregate amount of incentives to be provided by the Commonwealth in the incentive package including grants, tax incentives such as credits and exemptions related to economic development or the film or television industry, general or nongeneral funds, proceeds from bonds, rights to lease property at below fair market value, or any other incentives from the Commonwealth is in excess of $10 million in value. However, no review shall be required for a project if the only incentives to be provided to a potential project are nondiscretionary tax credits or exemptions available to any qualified taxpayer under existing law.

The Commission shall consist of 14 members as follows: seven members of the House Committee on Appropriations or the House Committee on Finance appointed by the chair of the House Committee on Appropriations and five members of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations appointed by the chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. In addition, the Secretaries of Finance and Commerce and Trade shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the Commission.

Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Members may be reappointed for successive terms.

The members of the Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman annually. A majority of the voting members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

Legislative members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative members shall receive such compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

.

As used in this chapter, “MEI project” means the same as that term is defined in §

2.2-2260

.

History.

2009, cc. 246, 311; 2010, cc. 543, 716; 2015, c. 761; 2020, c. 830.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 761, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Economic Development Partnership shall by November 30, 2015, provide a written report to the members of the MEI Project Approval Commission established under § 30-309 of the Code of Virginia identifying the specific statutes or programs under which state incentives were committed or allowed to economic development projects between January 1, 2010, and January 1, 2015, pursuant to incentive packages of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership. The report shall include the aggregate dollar value of state incentives committed or allowed under each specific statute or program during the five-year period. The report shall also include an assessment of the relative effectiveness of each state incentive and an evaluation of how each could be improved to better address the economic growth of the Commonwealth.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 543 and 716, are identical, and substituted “including but not limited to packages offering tax incentives, for economic development projects (including but not limited to MEI projects) for which (i) one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not authorized under current law or (ii) an amendment by the General Assembly is being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included as part of the incentive package” for “for MEI projects to be financed by the Virginia Public Building Authority” in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 761 added clause (ii) in subsection A; in subsection B, rewrote the first sentence, which read “The Commission shall consist of 10 members as follows: the chair of the House Committee on Appropriations and four members of the House Committee on Appropriations appointed by the chair and the chair of the Senate Finance Committee and two members of the Senate Finance Committee appointed by the chair.” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 830, in subsection A, inserted “film, and episodic television” inserted “related to economic development or the film or television industry” in clause (ii), and added the last sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “14 members” for “10 members,” “seven members” for “five members,” and “five members” for “three members.”

§ 30-310.
Review of incentive packages.

The Commission shall review individual incentive packages, including but not limited to packages offering tax incentives, for economic development, film, and episodic television projects (including but not limited to MEI projects) for which (i) one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not authorized under current law or an amendment by the General Assembly is being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included as part of the incentive package or (ii) the aggregate amount of incentives to be provided by the Commonwealth in the incentive package including grants, tax incentives such as credits and exemptions, general or nongeneral funds, proceeds from bonds, rights to lease property at below fair market value, or any other incentives from the Commonwealth is in excess of $10 million in value. However, no review shall be required for a project if the only incentives to be provided to a potential project are nondiscretionary tax credits or exemptions available to any qualified taxpayer under existing law. The Commission shall also review economic development projects in which a business relocates or expands its operations in one or more Virginia localities and simultaneously closes its operations or substantially reduces the number of its employees in another Virginia locality. The Commission shall recommend approval or denial of such packages and projects to the General Assembly. Factors that shall be considered by the Commission in its review shall include but not be limited to (a) return on investment, (b) the time frame for repayment of incentives to the Commonwealth, (c) average wages of the jobs created by the prospective MEI project or other economic development project, (d) the amount of capital investment that is required, and (e) the need for enhanced employment opportunities in the prospective location of the prospective MEI project or other economic development project.
A. 1. The Commission shall review individual incentive packages, including but not limited to packages offering tax incentives, for economic development, film, and episodic television projects (including but not limited to MEI projects) for which (i) one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not authorized under current law or an amendment by the General Assembly is being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included as part of the incentive package or (ii) the aggregate amount of incentives to be provided by the Commonwealth in the incentive package including grants, tax incentives such as credits and exemptions, general or nongeneral funds, proceeds from bonds, rights to lease property at below fair market value, or any other incentives from the Commonwealth is in excess of $10 million in value. However, no review shall be required for a project if the only incentives to be provided to a potential project are nondiscretionary tax credits or exemptions available to any qualified taxpayer under existing law. The Commission shall also review economic development projects in which a business relocates or expands its operations in one or more Virginia localities and simultaneously closes its operations or substantially reduces the number of its employees in another Virginia locality. The Commission shall recommend approval or denial of such packages and projects to the General Assembly. Factors that shall be considered by the Commission in its review shall include but not be limited to (a) return on investment, (b) the time frame for repayment of incentives to the Commonwealth, (c) average wages of the jobs created by the prospective MEI project or other economic development project, (d) the amount of capital investment that is required, and (e) the need for enhanced employment opportunities in the prospective location of the prospective MEI project or other economic development project.

Any time a proposed individual incentive package is to be considered by the Commission, materials outlining (i) the value of the proposed incentives; (ii) assumed return on investment; (iii) the time frame for repayment of incentives to the Commonwealth; (iv) average wages of the jobs created by the prospective economic development, film, or episodic television project; (v) the amount of capital investment that is required; (vi) the need for enhanced employment opportunities in the prospective location of the prospective economic development, film, or episodic television project; (vii) the total amount of state incentives received by the sponsor of the economic development, film, or episodic television project in the past; and (viii) a list of all other existing, nondiscretionary tax credits or exemptions for which the sponsor of the economic development, film, or episodic television project may qualify shall be provided to the staff of the House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations not less than five business days prior to the scheduled Commission meeting. Staff shall also be provided with an aggregate list of all discretionary incentives currently committed by the Commonwealth for the next 10 years, including anticipated requests for appropriations to satisfy such commitments during that time.

The timing of any request for an endorsement of a proposed individual incentive package should be scheduled so that the MEI Commission could, at its discretion, have up to seven days subsequent to the presentation of the incentive package prior to endorsing or rejecting such proposal.

An affirmative vote by four of the seven members of the Commission from the House of Delegates and three of the five members of the Commission from the Senate shall be required to endorse any incentive package, including but not limited to packages offering tax incentives, for economic development, film, and episodic television projects (including but not limited to MEI projects) for which (i) one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not authorized under current law or an amendment by the General Assembly is being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included as part of the incentive package or (ii) the aggregate amount of incentives to be provided by the Commonwealth in the incentive package including grants, tax incentives such as credits and exemptions, general or nongeneral funds, proceeds from bonds, rights to lease property at below fair market value, or any other incentives from the Commonwealth is in excess of $10 million in value. Such vote shall also be required to endorse any economic development project in which a business relocates or expands its operations in one or more Virginia localities and simultaneously closes its operations or substantially reduces the number of its employees in another Virginia locality. However, no vote shall be required for a project if the only incentives to be provided to a potential project are nondiscretionary tax credits or exemptions available to any qualified taxpayer under existing law.

History.

2009, cc. 246, 311; 2010, cc. 543, 716; 2013, c. 806; 2015, c. 761; 2017, c. 663; 2020, c. 830.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 112 Q, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any provisions of § 30-310, Code of Virginia, the MEI Commission shall only be required to review economic development incentive packages in which a business relocates or expands its operations in one or more Virginia localities and simultaneously closes its operations or substantially reduces the number of its employees in another Virginia locality that exceed $250,000 in aggregate incentive investments.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 543 and 716 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 806, added the subdivision A 1 designator and added subdivisions A 2 a and A 2 b.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 761 added clause (ii) in subdivision A 1 and subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 663 inserted the second sentence in subdivision A 1; and added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 830 in subdivision A 1, inserted “film, and episodic television” in the first sentence and inserted the second sentence; in subdivision A 2 a., substituted “economic development, film, or episodic television project” for “MEI project or other economic development project” in clauses (iv) and (vi), added clauses (vii) and (viii), substituted “staff of the House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance” for “Commission members,” substituted “five business days” for “48 hours”, and added the last sentence; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “four of the seven members” for “three of the five members”, substituted “three of the five members” for “two of the three members”, and inserted “film, and episodic television” and added the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 30-311.
Staff; cooperation from other state agencies.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the staffs of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. Additional assistance as needed shall be provided by the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Division of Legislative Services, the Virginia Economic Development Authority, or the Virginia Public Building Authority.

History.

2009, cc. 246, 311; 2020, c. 830.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Finance Committee.” March 10, 2021.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 830 inserted “the Division of Legislative Services” in the second sentence.

§ 30-312.
Commission report to General Assembly.

The chairman of the Commission shall report annually by the first day of each General Assembly Regular Session on all endorsed incentive packages for which an offer has been made and publicly announced. Staff identified in § 30-311 shall assist the commission in preparing such report, which shall contain the following information: (i) the industrial sector of the MEI project or other economic development project, (ii) known competitor states, (iii) employment creation and capital investment expectations, (iv) anticipated average annual wage of the new jobs, (v) local and state returns on investment as prepared by the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, (vi) expected time frame for repayment of the incentives to the Commonwealth in the form of direct and indirect general tax revenues, (vii) details of the proposed incentive package, including the breakdown of the components into various uses and an expected timeline for payments, and (viii) draft legislation or amendments to the Appropriation Act that propose financing for the endorsed incentive package through the Virginia Public Building Authority or any other proposed funding or financing mechanisms.

History.

2009, cc. 246, 311; 2010, cc. 543, 716; 2018, c. 735; 2020, c. 830.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 543 and 716 are identical, and in the second sentence, inserted “or other economic development project” in clause (i), and substituted “or” for “and” following “Virginia Public Building Authority.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 735 inserted “for which an offer has been made and publicly announced” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 830 inserted “chairman of the” preceding “Commission” in the first sentence.